Washington statutes.
RCW 19.120.080

Refiner-supplier and retailer relationship—Rights and prohibitions.

Without limiting the other provisions of this chapter, the following specific rights and prohibitions shall govern the relation between the motor fuel refiner-supplier and the motor fuel retailers:

(1) The parties shall deal with each other in good faith.

(2) For the purposes of this chapter and without limiting its general application, it shall be an unfair or deceptive act or practice or an unfair method of competition and therefore unlawful and a violation of this chapter for any person to:

(a) Require a motor fuel retailer to purchase or lease goods or services of the motor fuel refiner-supplier or from approved sources of supply unless and to the extent that the motor fuel refiner-supplier satisfies the burden of proving that such restrictive purchasing agreements are reasonably necessary for a lawful purpose justified on business grounds, and do not substantially affect competition: PROVIDED, That this provision shall not apply to the initial inventory of the motor fuel franchise. In determining whether a requirement to purchase or lease goods or services constitutes an unfair or deceptive act or practice or an unfair method of competition the courts shall be guided by the decisions of the courts of the United States interpreting and applying the anti-trust laws of the United States.

(b) Discriminate between motor fuel retailers in the charges offered or made for royalties, goods, services, equipment, rentals, advertising services, or in any other business dealing, unless and to the extent that the motor fuel refiner-supplier satisfies the burden of proving that any classification of or discrimination between motor fuel retailers is reasonable, is based on motor fuel franchises granted at materially different times and such discrimination is reasonably related to such difference in time or on other proper and justifiable distinctions considering the purposes of this chapter, and is not arbitrary.

(c) Sell, rent, or offer to sell to a motor fuel retailer any product or service for more than a fair and reasonable price.

(d) Require a motor fuel retailer to assent to a release, assignment, novation, or waiver which would relieve any person from liability imposed by this chapter.

[ 2000 c 171 s 72; 1986 c 320 s 9.]